Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.080

Credentialing requirements.

(1) The secretary shall issue a license or certificate, as appropriate, to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Graduation from an educational program approved by the secretary or successful completion of alternate training meeting established criteria;

(b) Successful completion of an approved examination; and

(c) Successful completion of any experience requirement established by the secretary.

(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial of a license or certificate or issuance of a conditional license or certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) The secretary shall issue a registration to any applicant who completes an application which identifies the name and address of the applicant, the registration being requested, and information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are grounds for denial of a registration or issuance of a conditional registration under chapter 18.130 RCW.

[ 1991 c 3 s 263; 1987 c 150 s 68.]